New Mexico, session 2026, SB61.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF NEW MEXICO: SECTION 1. APPROPRIATION.--Five million dollars ($5,000,000) is appropriated from the general fund to the cultural affairs department for expenditure in fiscal years 2027 and 2028 to support the operation of rural libraries; provided that no more than two million five hundred thousand dollars ($2,500,000) shall be spent in any one fiscal year. Any unexpended balance remaining at the end of fiscal year 2028 shall revert to the general fund. .233060.1